Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.280

Licensed day care centers and outdoor nature-based child care providers—Notice of pesticide use.

Licensed child day care centers and outdoor nature-based child care providers shall provide notice of pesticide use to parents or guardians of students and employees pursuant to chapter 17.21 RCW.

[ 2021 c 304 s 13; 2006 c 265 s 303. Formerly RCW 43.215.220.]